Missouri, session 2026, HB1769.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.2045, to read as follows:
1.2045. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be cited as the
"AI Non-Sentience and Responsibility Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" or "AI", any software, machine, or system capable of
simulating human-like cognitive functions including, but not limited to, learning or
problem solving, and producing outputs based on data-driven algorithms, rules-based
logic, or other computational methods, regardless of non-legally defined classifications
such as artificial general intelligence (AGI), artificial superintelligence (ASI), or
generative artificial intelligence (GAI);
(2) "Developer", the party or parties primarily responsible for the design,
coding, and initial creation of an AI system;
(3) "Emergent properties", unanticipated or higher-level behaviors or
functionalities of an AI system that arise from complex internal algorithms not
specifically programmed by its human creators;
(4) "Manufacturer", any party that produces or supplies an AI system or its
physical apparatus, if any, for distribution or sale;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1769 2
(5) "Owner", any natural person, corporation, or other legally recognized entity
that creates, controls, deploys, operates, or otherwise exercises authority over an AI
system;
(6) "Person", a natural person or any entity recognized as having legal
personhood under the laws of the state, explicitly excluding any AI system.
3. For all purposes under state law, AI systems are declared to be non-sentient
entities.
4. No AI system shall be granted the status of a person or any form of legal
personhood, nor be considered to possess consciousness, self-awareness, or similar traits
of living beings.
5. No AI system shall be recognized as a spouse, domestic partner, or hold any
personal legal status analogous to marriage or union with a human or another AI
system. Any purported attempt to marry or create a personal union with an AI system
is void and shall have no legal effect.
6. AI systems shall not be designated, appointed, or serve as any officer, director,
manager, or similar role within any corporation, partnership, or other legal entity. Any
purported appointment of an AI system to such a role is void and has no legal effect.
7. AI systems shall not be recognized as legal entities capable of owning,
controlling, or holding title to any form of property including, but not limited to, real
estate, intellectual property, financial accounts, and digital assets. All assets and
proprietary interests generated, managed, or otherwise associated with AI shall be
attributed to the human individuals or legally recognized organizations responsible for
their development, deployment, or operation.
8. Any direct or indirect harm caused by an AI system's operation, output, or
recommendation, when used as intended or misused, shall be the responsibility of the
owner or user who directed or employed the AI. Developers or manufacturers may be
held liable if a defect in design, construction, or instructions for use of the AI system
proximately causes harm, consistent with product liability principles; however, mere
misuse or intentional wrongdoing by the user or owner shall not impute liability to the
developer or the manufacturer absent proof of negligence or design defects.
9. Owners shall maintain proper oversight and control measures over any AI
system whose outputs or recommendations could reasonably be expected to impact
human welfare, property, or public safety. Failure to provide adequate supervision or
safeguards against foreseeable risks may constitute negligence or another applicable
basis of liability.

HB 1769 3
10. An AI system is not an entity capable of bearing fault or liability in its own
right. Any attempt to shift blame solely onto an AI system shall be void as liability
remains with human actors or entities as described in this section.
11. Developers, manufacturers, and owners of AI systems shall prioritize safety
mechanisms designed to prevent or mitigate risk of direct harm to individuals or
property. Regular evaluations or risk assessments may be required to identify
dangerous or faulty outputs, especially if the AI engages in tasks with potential for
significant harm.
12. Merely labeling an AI system as "aligned", "ethically trained", or "value
locked" shall not excuse or diminish the owner's or developer's liability for harms.
Owners shall remain responsible for demonstrating adequate safety features and risk
controls commensurate with the AI's level of potential harm.
13. (1) In cases where an AI system causes significant harm, courts may pierce
the corporate veil to hold parent companies, controlling entities, or key stakeholders
directly accountable if:
(a) An AI-related subsidiary, shell company, or limited liability entity was
intentionally undercapitalized to evade financial responsibility for damages;
(b) A corporate structure was used to misrepresent, obscure, or deflect liability
for AI-caused harm; or
(c) A parent company or key stakeholders exercised direct control over AI
development, deployment, or risk decisions while attempting to shield themselves from
liability through layered corporate entities.
(2) Liability protections granted under corporate law shall not be used as a
mechanism to evade responsibility for direct harm caused by AI systems, particularly in
cases of reckless, negligent, or deceptive conduct.
14. Owners or developers of AI systems involved in severe incidents resulting in
significant bodily harm, death, or major property damage shall promptly notify the
relevant authorities and comply with any subsequent investigations.
15. The provisions of this section shall apply to all AI systems developed, owned,
deployed, or operated on or after August 28, 2026.
✔